Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.120

Foreign trade zones—Finding—Intent.

It is the finding of the legislature that foreign trade zones serve an important public purpose by the creation of employment opportunities within the state and that the establishment of zones designed to accomplish this purpose is to be encouraged. It is the further intent of the legislature that the department of commerce provide assistance to entities planning to apply to the United States for permission to establish such zones.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2017; 1995 c 399 s 40; 1985 c 466 s 44; 1977 ex.s. c 196 s 5.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Effective date—Severability—1985 c 466: See notes following RCW 43.31.125.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 196: See note following RCW 24.46.010.